North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 22. Regulation of Wildlife.
§ 113-296.
Disabled Sportsman Program.

The Disabled Sportsman Program is established, to be developed and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission. The Disabled Sportsman Program shall consist of special hunting and fishing activities adapted to the needs of persons with the disabilities described in subsection (b) of this section.

In order to be eligible for participation in the Disabled Sportsman Program established by this section, an individual must be a holder of a Resident Disabled Veteran or Resident Totally Disabled license or must be able to certify through competent medical evidence one of the following disabilities:

Missing fifty percent (50%) or more of one or more limbs, whether by amputation or natural causes.

Paralysis of one or more limbs.

Dysfunction of one or more limbs rendering the individual unable to perform the tasks of grasping and lifting with the hands and arms or unable to walk without mechanical assistance, other than a cane.

Disease, injury, or defect confining the individual to a wheelchair, walker, or crutches.

Legal deafness.

Legal blindness, for purposes of participation in disabled fishing only.The disability must be permanent, and an individual loses eligibility to participate in the Disabled Sportsman Program when the specified disability ceases to exist.

A person who qualifies under subsection (b) of this section may apply for participation in the Disabled Sportsman Program by completing an application supplied by the Wildlife Resources Commission and by supplying the medical evidence necessary to confirm the person’s disability. In order to participate in activities under the Program, each disabled participant may be accompanied by an able-bodied companion, who may also participate in the hunting, fishing, or other activity. The Commission shall charge each disabled participant an application fee of ten-dollars ($10.00) to defray the cost of processing the application and administering the special activities provided under the Program. An applicant may apply for any or all available Disabled Sportsman hunts at the time of application for a single fee. Any subsequent applications shall be accompanied by an additional ten-dollar ($10.00) application fee. The participant and the participant’s companion shall also obtain any applicable hunting, fishing, or other special license required for the activities.

In developing the Disabled Sportsman Program, the Wildlife Resources Commission shall:

Establish special seasons and bag limits for hunting all or selected species of wildlife;

Authorize the manner for taking wildlife, consistent with State law;

Permit the use of vehicles and other means of conveyance in areas normally closed to such use;

Set special fishing seasons and size and creel limits for inland fish; and

Permit the use of crossbows or other specially equipped bows by persons incapable of arm movement sufficient to operate a longbow, recurve bow, or compound bow, but only during a season for hunting with bow and arrow and only during a special hunt organized and supervised by the Wildlife Resources Commission for the Disabled Sportsman Program; and

Alter any other established rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission pertaining to hunting, fishing, or special activities, as generally applicable or as applicable to game lands, for the purpose of providing access to disabled persons participating in the Disabled Sportsman Program.The Wildlife Resources Commission may use its game lands for purposes of conducting special activities for the Disabled Sportsman Program, and may enter into agreements with other landholders for purposes of conducting special activities on private lands.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may establish special activities under the Disabled Sportsman Program for any class or classes of disability described in subsection (b) of this section. The Commission shall publicize these activities through the public media and in the Commission’s publications to ensure that disabled persons are notified of the activities and informed about the application process.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall hold at least four special hunting activities under the Disabled Sportsman Program per calendar year. The Commission shall alternate the location of these special activities so as to provide equal access to disabled persons in all regions of the State.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 557, s. 1; 2005-438, s. 3; 2005-455, s. 1.15; 2008-205, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to adoption of rules establishing fees for hunting, fishing, trapping and activity licenses issued and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission, see

G.S. 113-270.1

B(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-438, s. 3, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the next-to-last sentence in subsection (d); and deleted “at least two during the season for taking deer with bow and arrow and at least two during the season for taking deer with guns” from the end of the first sentence in subsection (f).

Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.15, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “an individual” for “a person” in the first and last paragraphs of subsection (b); rewrote subdivision (b)(1); substituted “individual” for “person” in subdivisions (b)(3) and (b)(4); deleted “or” at the end of subdivision (b)(5); and made minor punctuation changes.

Session Laws 2008-205, s. 2, effective July 1, 2008, in subsection (b), inserted “a holder of a Resident Disabled Veteran or Resident Totally Disabled license or must be”; and in subsection (c), substituted “ten-dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00) for each special hunt for disabled persons for which the disabled hunter applies not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) annually” in the third sentence and added the fourth and fifth sentences.

§ 113-297.
Method exemptions for disabled persons.

Any person whose physical disability makes it impossible for the person to hunt or fish by conventional methods for one year or more may apply to the Wildlife Resources Commission for a hunting or fishing methods exemption allowing that person to hunt or fish in a manner that would otherwise be prohibited by rules adopted by the Commission. The application shall be accompanied by a signed statement from a physician containing the following information:

The nature of the person’s disability;

The necessity of the exemption in order to allow the person to hunt or fish; and

Whether the disability is permanent or temporary and, if temporary, the length of time after which the physician anticipates that the person may be able to hunt or fish without the exemption.The Wildlife Resources Commission may authorize any reasonable exemption in order to permit a disabled person complying with the requirements of this section to hunt or fish and may issue a permit describing the exemption made in each case. The permit may be permanent or, if the disability is temporary, the permit may coincide with the length of time the signed physician’s statement indicates the disability is expected to last. A person issued a permit under this section shall possess the permit while hunting or fishing in the exempted manner.

In addition to providing disabled persons reasonable exemptions from rules adopted by the Wildlife Resources Commission, the Commission may permit a person complying with the application procedure outlined in subsection (a) of this section to use a crossbow or other specially equipped bow if the physician’s statement indicates that the person is incapable of arm movement sufficient to operate a longbow, recurve bow, or compound bow.

History.

1995, c. 62, s. 1.

§ 113-298.
Unlawful use of facilities provided for disabled sportsman.

Any person who knowingly uses facilities or participates in activities provided by the Wildlife Resources Commission for disabled sportsmen, when that person does not meet the qualifications for use of those facilities or participation in those activities, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1997-326, s. 5.

§ 113-299.
Aerial management of feral swine.

Notwithstanding G.S. 113-291.1(b)(1), employees of the Wildlife Resources Commission and employees of federal agencies whose responsibilities include fisheries and wildlife management, in the performance of such employees’ official duties, may cull feral swine from aircraft, with the written permission of the landowner. However, no such activity shall occur in coastal counties, as defined in G.S. 113A-103(2) during waterfowl season.

History.

2016-113, s. 3.

§ 113-300.

Reserved for future codification purposes.